Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1569
Scald prevention device; required; when.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all bathtubs and showers installed in buildings which contain more than one dwelling unit after August 30, 1987, shall be equipped with either a pressure balancing or thermostatic-mixing scald prevention device which is designed and installed to prevent (a) sudden unanticipated changes in the temperature of the water delivered and (b) the temperature of the water delivered from exceeding one hundred fifteen degrees Fahrenheit.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to showers or bathtubs installed in modular housing units as defined in section 71-1557, manufactured homes as defined in section 71-4603, or recreational vehicles as defined in section 71-4603.

Laws 1987, LB 264, § 1.